Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.140

Opinions available to reporter.

The reporter may take the original opinions and papers in each case from the clerk's office and retain them in his or her possession not exceeding sixty days.

[ 2011 c 336 s 49; 1890 p 320 s 5; RRS s 11062.]